Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
STATE PARKS

§184-1 Definitions. As used in this
part, unless otherwise indicated by the context:

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Land", without prejudice to the
generality of the term, includes upland, land under water, beaches, water, and
water rights.

"Park" means an area which, by reason
of location, natural features, scenic beauty or legendary, historical, or
scientific interest, possesses distinctive physical, aesthetic, intellectual,
creative, or social values.

"Parkway" means an elongated park
transversed by a pleasure vehicle road, but does not include the road.

"State park system" means the parks
and parkways designated by the department, control of which is acquired by the
department as provided in this part. [L 1949, c 185, pt of §1; RL 1955, §19-30;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §184-1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next